Illinois, session 104th, SB2771.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as Tammurra's Act. 5    Section 5. The County Shelter Care and Detention Home Act 6is amended by adding Section 2.2 as follows: 7    (55 ILCS 75/2.2 new)8    Sec. 2.2. Suicide prevention information. Each county 9shelter care home and detention home authorized and 10established by this Act shall place contact information for 11the 9-8-8 National Suicide Prevention Lifeline in the home in 12a prominent location that is visible to and accessible by 13children who are committed to the home by the court. 14    Section 10. The Illinois Local Library Act is amended by 15adding Section 1-9 as follows: 16    (75 ILCS 5/1-9 new)17    Sec. 1-9. Suicide prevention information. A public library 18shall place contact information for the 9-8-8 National Suicide 19Prevention Lifeline in the library in a prominent location 20that is visible to and accessible by patrons.   SB2771 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1    Section 15. The Public Library District Act of 1991 is 2amended by adding Section 1-27 as follows: 3    (75 ILCS 16/1-27 new)4    Sec. 1-27. Suicide prevention information. A public 5library shall place contact information for the 9-8-8 National 6Suicide Prevention Lifeline in the library in a prominent 7location that is visible to and accessible by patrons. 8    Section 20. The Village Library Act is amended by adding 9Section 4.5 as follows: 10    (75 ILCS 40/4.5 new)11    Sec. 4.5. Suicide prevention information. A public library 12shall place contact information for the 9-8-8 National Suicide 13Prevention Lifeline in the library in a prominent location 14that is visible to and accessible by patrons. 15    Section 25. The Libraries in Parks Act is amended by 16adding Section 3b as follows: 17    (75 ILCS 65/3b new)18    Sec. 3b. Suicide prevention information. A public library 19shall place contact information for the 9-8-8 National Suicide 20Prevention Lifeline in the library in a prominent location   SB2771 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1that is visible to and accessible by patrons. 2    Section 30. The School Code is amended by changing Section 327-215 as follows: 4    (105 ILCS 5/27-215)5    Sec. 27-215. Comprehensive health education program. 6    (a) In this subsection (a):7    "Age and developmentally appropriate" means suitable to 8particular ages or age groups of children or adolescents, 9based on the developing cognitive, emotional, and behavioral 10capacity typical for the age or age group.11    "Consent" means an affirmative, knowing, conscious, 12ongoing, and voluntary agreement to engage in interpersonal, 13physical, or sexual activity, which can be revoked at any 14point, including during the course of interpersonal, physical, 15or sexual activity.16    The program established under this Act shall include, but 17not be limited to, the following major educational areas as a 18basis for curricula in all elementary and secondary schools in 19this State, with applicable Illinois Learning Standards 20adopted by the State Board of Education guiding the 21instruction in the program:22        (1) human ecology, health, growth, development, 23    personal health habits, and nutrition, consistent with the 24    Illinois Learning Standards adopted by the State Board of   SB2771 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1    Education;2        (2) the emotional, psychological, physiological, 3    hygienic, and social responsibilities of family life, 4    including evidence-based and medically accurate 5    information regarding sexual abstinence;6        (3) the prevention and control of disease, including 7    instruction in grades 6 through 12 on the prevention, 8    transmission, and spread of AIDS;9        (4) age and developmentally appropriate sexual abuse, 10    consistent with Section 10-23.13 of this Code, abuse 11    during pregnancy, and assault awareness and prevention 12    education in grades prekindergarten through 12;13        (5) public health, environmental health, disaster 14    preparedness education, and safety education;15        (6) mental health and illness;16        (7) dental health;17        (8) cancer education that includes the types of 18    cancer, signs and symptoms, risk factors, the importance 19    of early prevention and detection, and information on 20    where to get help and treatment for cancer; and21        (9) age and developmentally appropriate consent 22    education.23    The instruction on mental health and illness must evaluate 24the multiple dimensions of health by reviewing the 25relationship between physical and mental health to enhance 26student understanding, attitudes, and behaviors that promote   SB2771 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1health, well-being, and human dignity and must include how and 2where to find mental health resources and specialized 3treatment in the State. To raise mental health awareness for 4students in grades 6 through 12, a school board shall require 5each public school serving students in any of grades 6 through 612 to implement age-appropriate, evidence-based suicide 7prevention curricula if opportunities for integration exist. 8The State Board of Education may make resource materials 9available to support school districts and educators with 10evidence-based, developmentally appropriate resources 11regarding student instruction in the topics of mental health 12and illness. The State Board of Education may make these 13resource materials available on its Internet website. The 14program shall also provide course material and instruction to 15advise pupils of the Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.16    Consent education must be age and developmentally 17appropriate, and the instruction on age and developmentally 18appropriate consent shall require only instruction aligning 19with consent as defined in this Section. 20    (b) Notwithstanding the educational areas under subsection 21(a), the following areas may also be included as a basis for 22curricula in all elementary and secondary schools in this 23State: basic first aid (including, but not limited to, 24cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the Heimlich maneuver), 25heart disease, diabetes, stroke, the prevention of child 26abuse, neglect, and suicide, and teen dating violence in   SB2771 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1grades 7 through 12.2    (c) The State Superintendent of Education, in cooperation 3with the Department of Children and Family Services, shall 4prepare and disseminate to all public schools and nonpublic 5schools information on instructional materials and programs 6about child sexual abuse, which may be used by such schools for 7their own or community programs. Such information may also be 8disseminated by such schools to parents. 9    (d) No pupil shall be required to take or participate in 10any class or course on AIDS or family life instruction or to 11receive training on how to properly administer cardiopulmonary 12resuscitation or how to use an automated external 13defibrillator if his or her parent or guardian submits written 14objection thereto, and refusal to take or participate in the 15course or program or the training shall not be reason for 16suspension or expulsion of the pupil.17(Source: P.A. 104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 18    Section 35. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 19adding Section 11 as follows: 20    (110 ILCS 167/11 new)21    Sec. 11. Suicide prevention information. A public 22institution of higher education shall place contact 23information for the 9-8-8 National Suicide Prevention Lifeline 24in the each of its facilities in a prominent location that is   SB2771 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1visible to and accessible by students and staff of the public 2institution of higher education. 3    Section 40. The University of Illinois Hospital Act is 4amended by adding Section 20 as follows: 5    (110 ILCS 330/20 new)6    Sec. 20. Compliance with the Hospital Licensing Act; 7suicide prevention information. The University of Illinois 8Hospital shall comply with Section 11.11 of the Hospital 9Licensing Act. 10    Section 45. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 11amended by adding Section 151 as follows: 12    (210 ILCS 9/151 new)13    Sec. 151. Suicide prevention information. An assisted 14living or shared housing establishment shall place contact 15information for the 9-8-8 National Suicide Prevention Lifeline 16in the establishment in a prominent location that is visible 17to and accessible by residents and staff of the establishment. 18    Section 50. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by adding 19Section 3-202.2c as follows: 20    (210 ILCS 45/3-202.2c new)  SB2771 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1    Sec. 3-202.2c. Suicide prevention information. A nursing 2facility that is subject to this Act shall place contact 3information for the 9-8-8 National Suicide Prevention Lifeline 4in the facility in a prominent location that is visible to and 5accessible by residents and staff of the facility. 6    Section 55. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 7adding Section 11.11 as follows: 8    (210 ILCS 85/11.11 new)9    Sec. 11.11. Suicide prevention information. A hospital 10shall conspicuously post contact information for the 9-8-8 11National Suicide Prevention Lifeline in the hospital, either 12by physical or electronic means, for display in an area of its 13offices accessible by patients, employees, and visitors. 14    Section 60. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 15changing Section 7.01 as follows: 16    (225 ILCS 10/7.01)17    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 18delayed effective date)19    Sec. 7.01. Minimum standards for licensing; Department of 20Early Childhood.21    (a) The Department of Early Childhood must prescribe and 22publish minimum standards for licensing that apply to day care   SB2771 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1centers, day care homes, and group day care homes. The 2Department of Early Childhood shall seek the advice and 3assistance of persons representative of day care centers, day 4care homes, and group day care homes in establishing such 5standards. The standards prescribed and published under this 6Act take effect as provided in the Illinois Administrative 7Procedure Act, and are restricted to rules pertaining to the 8following matters and to any rules required or permitted by 9any other Section of this Act:10        (1) The operation and conduct of the facility and 11    responsibility it assumes for child care;12        (2) The character, suitability and qualifications of 13    the applicant and other persons directly responsible for 14    the care and welfare of children served. All child day 15    care center licensees and employees who are required to 16    report child abuse or neglect under the Abused and 17    Neglected Child Reporting Act shall be required to attend 18    training on recognizing child abuse and neglect, as 19    prescribed by Department of Early Childhood rules;20        (3) The general financial ability and competence of 21    the applicant to provide necessary care for children and 22    to maintain prescribed standards;23        (4) The number of individuals or staff required to 24    ensure adequate supervision and care of the children 25    received. The standards shall provide that each day care 26    center, day care home, and group day care home shall have   SB2771 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1    on its premises during its hours of operation at least one 2    staff member certified in first aid, in the Heimlich 3    maneuver and in cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the 4    American Red Cross or other organization approved by rule 5    of the Department of Early Childhood. The Department of 6    Early Childhood may offer, or arrange for the offering, on 7    a periodic basis in each community in this State in 8    cooperation with the American Red Cross, the American 9    Heart Association or other appropriate organization, 10    voluntary programs to train operators of day care homes in 11    first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation;12        (5) The appropriateness, safety, cleanliness, and 13    general adequacy of the premises, including maintenance of 14    adequate fire prevention and health standards conforming 15    to State laws and municipal codes to provide for the 16    physical comfort, care, and well-being of children 17    received;18        (6) Provisions for food, clothing, educational 19    opportunities, program, equipment and individual supplies 20    to ensure the healthy physical, mental, and spiritual 21    development of children served;22        (7) Provisions to safeguard the legal rights of 23    children served;24        (8) Maintenance of records pertaining to the 25    admission, progress, health, and discharge of children, 26    including, for day care centers and day care homes,   SB2771 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1    records indicating each child has been immunized as 2    required by State regulations. The Department of Early 3    Childhood shall require proof that children enrolled in a 4    facility have been immunized against Haemophilus 5    Influenzae B (HIB);6        (9) Filing of reports with the Department of Early 7    Childhood;8        (10) Discipline of children;9        (11) Protection and fostering of the particular 10    religious faith of the children served;11        (12) Provisions prohibiting firearms on day care 12    center premises except in the possession of peace 13    officers;14        (13) Provisions prohibiting handguns on day care home 15    premises except in the possession of peace officers or 16    other adults who must possess a handgun as a condition of 17    employment and who reside on the premises of a day care 18    home;19        (14) Provisions requiring that any firearm permitted 20    on day care home premises, except handguns in the 21    possession of peace officers, shall be kept in a 22    disassembled state, without ammunition, in locked storage, 23    inaccessible to children and that ammunition permitted on 24    day care home premises shall be kept in locked storage 25    separate from that of disassembled firearms, inaccessible 26    to children;  SB2771 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1        (15) Provisions requiring notification of parents or 2    guardians enrolling children at a day care home of the 3    presence in the day care home of any firearms and 4    ammunition and of the arrangements for the separate, 5    locked storage of such firearms and ammunition; and6        (16) Provisions requiring all licensed child care 7    facility employees who care for newborns and infants to 8    complete training every 3 years on the nature of sudden 9    unexpected infant death (SUID), sudden infant death 10    syndrome (SIDS), and the safe sleep recommendations of the 11    American Academy of Pediatrics; and .12        (17) Provisions requiring all licensed day care 13    centers to place contact information for the 9-8-8 14    National Suicide Prevention Lifeline in the licensed day 15    care center in a prominent location that is visible to and 16    accessible by children and employees of the licensed day 17    care center. 18    All licensed day care home providers, licensed group day 19care home providers, and licensed day care center directors 20and classroom staff shall participate in at least one training 21that includes the topics of early childhood social emotional 22learning, infant and early childhood mental health, early 23childhood trauma, or adverse childhood experiences. Current 24licensed providers, directors, and classroom staff shall 25complete training and shall participate in training that 26includes the above topics at least once every 3 years.  SB2771 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1    (b) The Department of Early Childhood, in applying 2standards prescribed and published, as herein provided, shall 3offer consultation through employed staff or other qualified 4persons to assist applicants and licensees in meeting and 5maintaining minimum requirements for a license and to help 6them otherwise to achieve programs of excellence related to 7the care of children served. Such consultation shall include 8providing information concerning education and training in 9early childhood development to providers of day care home 10services. The Department of Early Childhood may provide or 11arrange for such education and training for those providers 12who request such assistance.13    (c) The Department of Early Childhood shall distribute 14copies of licensing standards to all licensees and applicants 15for a license. Each licensee or holder of a permit shall 16distribute copies of the appropriate licensing standards and 17any other information required by the Department of Early 18Childhood to child care facilities under its supervision. Each 19licensee or holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate 20documentation of the distribution of the standards. Such 21documentation shall be part of the records of the facility and 22subject to inspection by authorized representatives of the 23Department of Early Childhood.24    (d) The Department of Early Childhood shall prepare 25summaries of day care licensing standards. Each licensee or 26holder of a permit for a day care facility shall distribute a   SB2771 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1copy of the appropriate summary and any other information 2required by the Department of Early Childhood, to the legal 3guardian of each child cared for in that facility at the time 4when the child is enrolled or initially placed in the 5facility. The licensee or holder of a permit for a day care 6facility shall secure appropriate documentation of the 7distribution of the summary and brochure. Such documentation 8shall be a part of the records of the facility and subject to 9inspection by an authorized representative of the Department 10of Early Childhood.11    (e) The Department of Early Childhood shall distribute to 12each licensee and holder of a permit copies of the licensing or 13permit standards applicable to such person's facility. Each 14licensee or holder of a permit shall make available by posting 15at all times in a common or otherwise accessible area a 16complete and current set of licensing standards in order that 17all employees of the facility may have unrestricted access to 18such standards. All employees of the facility shall have 19reviewed the standards and any subsequent changes. Each 20licensee or holder of a permit shall maintain appropriate 21documentation of the current review of licensing standards by 22all employees. Such records shall be part of the records of the 23facility and subject to inspection by authorized 24representatives of the Department of Early Childhood.25    (f) Any standards involving physical examinations, 26immunization, or medical treatment shall include appropriate   SB2771 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1exemptions for children whose parents object thereto on the 2grounds that they conflict with the tenets and practices of a 3recognized church or religious organization, of which the 4parent is an adherent or member, and for children who should 5not be subjected to immunization for clinical reasons.6    (g) The Department of Early Childhood, in cooperation with 7the Department of Public Health, shall work to increase 8immunization awareness and participation among parents of 9children enrolled in day care centers and day care homes by 10publishing on the Department of Early Childhood's website 11information about the benefits of immunization against vaccine 12preventable diseases, including influenza and pertussis. The 13information for vaccine preventable diseases shall include the 14incidence and severity of the diseases, the availability of 15vaccines, and the importance of immunizing children and 16persons who frequently have close contact with children. The 17website content shall be reviewed annually in collaboration 18with the Department of Public Health to reflect the most 19current recommendations of the Advisory Committee on 20Immunization Practices (ACIP). The Department of Early 21Childhood shall work with day care centers and day care homes 22licensed under this Act to ensure that the information is 23annually distributed to parents in August or September.24    (h) Any standard adopted by the Department of Early 25Childhood that requires an applicant for a license to operate 26a day care home to include a copy of a high school diploma or   SB2771 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1equivalent certificate with the person's application shall be 2deemed to be satisfied if the applicant includes a copy of a 3high school diploma or equivalent certificate or a copy of a 4degree from an accredited institution of higher education or 5vocational institution or equivalent certificate.6(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 7    Section 65. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 8adding Section 3-7-7.5 and by changing Section 5-8A-4.2 as 9follows: 10    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-7.5 new)11    Sec. 3-7-7.5. Suicide prevention information. The 12Department shall place contact information for the 9-8-8 13National Suicide Prevention Lifeline in each institution or 14facility of the Department in a prominent location that is 15visible to and accessible by committed persons in the 16institution or facility. 17    (730 ILCS 5/5-8A-4.2)18    Sec. 5-8A-4.2. Successful transition to the community.19    (a) The Department shall engage in reentry planning to 20include individualized case planning for persons preparing to 21be released to the community. This planning shall begin at 22intake and be supported throughout the term of incarceration, 23with a focused emphasis in the year prior to the inmate's   SB2771 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1mandatory statutory release date. All inmates within one year 2of their mandatory statutory release data shall be deemed to 3be in reentry status. The Department shall develop 4administrative directives to define reentry status based on 5the requirements of this Section.6    (b) The Department shall develop incentives to increase 7program and treatment participation, positive behavior, and 8readiness to change.9    (c) The Department shall coordinate with, and provide 10access at the point of release for, community partners and 11State and local government agencies to support successful 12transitions through assistance in planning and by providing 13appropriate programs to inmates in reentry status. The 14Department shall work with community partners and appropriate 15state agencies to support the successful transitions through 16assistance in planning and by providing appropriate programs 17to persons prior to release. Release planning shall include, 18but is not limited to:19        (1) necessary documentation to include birth 20    certificate, social security card, and identification 21    card;22        (2) vocational or educational short-term and long-term 23    goals;24        (3) financial literacy and planning to include 25    payments of fines, fees, restitution, child support, and 26    other debt;  SB2771 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1        (4) access to healthcare, mental healthcare, and 2    chemical dependency treatment, including suicide 3    prevention resources;4        (5) living and transportation arrangements;5        (6) family reunification, if appropriate, and 6    pro-social support networks; and7        (7) information about community-based employment 8    services and employment service programs available for 9    persons with prior arrest or criminal convictions. 10    (d) The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall 11create a Frequent Users Systems Engagement (FUSE) Re-Entry 12rental subsidy supportive housing program for the most 13vulnerable persons exiting the Department of Corrections. The 14Re-Entry rental subsidy supportive housing program shall be 15targeted to persons with disabilities who have a history of 16incarcerations, hospitalizations, and homelessness. The 17Illinois Housing Development Authority, the Department of 18Human Services Statewide Housing Coordinator, stakeholders, 19and the Department of Corrections shall adopt policies and 20procedures for the FUSE Re-Entry rental subsidy supportive 21housing program including eligibility criteria, geographic 22distribution, and documentation requirements which are similar 23to the Rental Housing Support Program. The funding formula for 24this program shall be developed by calculating the number of 25prison bed days saved through the timely releases that would 26not be possible but for the Re-Entry rental subsidy supportive   SB2771 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1housing program. Funding shall include administrative costs 2for the Illinois Housing Development Authority to operate the 3program.4    (e) The Department shall report to the General Assembly on 5or before January 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, on these 6activities to support successful transitions to the community. 7This report shall include the following information regarding 8persons released from the Department:9        (1) the total number of persons released each year 10    listed by county;11        (2) the number of persons assessed as having a high or 12    moderate criminogenic need who have completed programming 13    addressing that criminogenic need prior to release listed 14    by program and county;15        (3) the number of persons released in the reporting 16    year who have engaged in pre-release planning prior to 17    their release listed by county;18        (4) the number of persons who have been released to 19    electronic detention prior to their mandatory supervised 20    release date;21        (5) the number of persons who have been released after 22    their mandatory supervised release date, average time past 23    mandatory supervised release date, and reasons held past 24    mandatory supervised release date; and25        (6) when implemented, the number of Frequent Users 26    Systems Engagement (FUSE) Re-Entry rental subsidy   SB2771 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 16416 LNS 29806 b1    supportive housing program participants and average prison 2    bed days saved.3(Source: P.A. 100-575, eff. 1-8-18.) 4    Section 70. The Probation and Probation Officers Act is 5amended by adding Section 15.3 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 110/15.3 new)7    Sec. 15.3. Suicide prevention information. A department 8shall ensure that, for all programs operated by the 9department, contact information for the 9-8-8 National Suicide 10Prevention Lifeline is posted in a prominent location that is 11visible to and accessible by offenders in the program.